Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Personnel Administration System
§ 25-9-131.
Proceedings before employee appeals board; judicial review; legislative intent.

Any employee in the state service may appeal his dismissal or other action adversely affecting his employment status to the employee appeals board created herein. The proceedings before the employee appeals board shall be de novo, and the employee shall be afforded all applicable safeguards of procedural due process. The employee appeals board shall have the authority to administer oaths and affirmations and to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records or other documentary evidence upon a showing of relevancy or materiality of the witnesses or documents to an appeal pending before the board. Subpoenas so issued shall be delivered to the sheriff of the county where they are to be executed, and the sheriff shall cause them to be served. In case of the failure of any person to comply with any subpoena issued by the board, the board or its authorized representative may invoke the aid of any court of this state of general jurisdiction. The court may thereupon order such person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. The employee appeals board may modify the action of the department, agency or institution but may not increase the severity of such action on the employee. Such appointing authority shall promptly comply with the order issued as a result of the appeal to the employee appeals board.

Any employee aggrieved by a final decision of the employee appeals board shall be entitled to judicial review thereof in the manner provided by law.

It is the intent of Sections 25-9-127 through 25-9-131 to supercede and replace any existing statutory procedure conflicting in whole or in part which provides for the discharge of state employees in any state agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 9(3)-(5); Laws, 1983, ch. 349, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 25-9-132.
Judicial review of employee appeals board decisions.

Any employee aggrieved by a final decision of the employee appeals board shall be entitled to judicial review thereof in the manner provided in this section.

An appeal may be taken by such employee to the circuit court of the principal county of the employee’s employment or the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, by filing a petition with the clerk of such court and executing and filing bond payable to the State of Mississippi with sufficient sureties to be approved by the clerk of the court, in the penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), conditioned upon the payment of all costs of appeal, including the cost of preparing the transcript of the hearing before the employee appeals board. The petition and bond shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the final decision of the employee appeals board. Upon approval of the bond, the clerk of the court shall notify the employee appeals board, which shall prepare its record in the matter and transmit it to the circuit court.

The scope of review of the circuit court in such cases shall be limited to a review of the record made before the employee appeals board or hearing officer to determine if the action of the employee appeals board is unlawful for the reason that it was:

Not supported by any substantial evidence;

Arbitrary or capricious; or

In violation of some statutory or constitutional right of the employee.

No relief shall be granted based upon the court’s finding of harmless error by the board in complying with the procedural requirements of Sections 25-9-127 through 25-9-129; provided, however, in the event that there is a finding of prejudicial error in the proceedings, the cause may be remanded for a rehearing consistent with the findings of the court.

Any party aggrieved by action of the circuit court may appeal to the Supreme Court in the manner provided by law.

In each controversy in which the employee appeals board assumes jurisdiction, the State Personnel Board shall assess the respondent state agency a reasonable fee to defray the cost of recording the hearing. The State Personnel Board is hereby authorized to contract with certified court reporters to record hearings before the employee appeals board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 468, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1984).

§ 25-9-133.
Recommendations and position audits by board.

The board shall recommend policies and procedures for the efficient and economical use of employment positions. The board shall report to the State Fiscal Management Board and the Legislative Budget Office recommendations for the number of employment positions and costs within each department, agency or institution. Such recommendation shall include the job title and salary of each position. The board shall conduct periodic position audits within each department, agency or institution to ensure the effective and efficient use of all personnel resources and to determine compliance with organization and staffing plans by agencies as presented by Section 25-9-115(n).

No person shall be employed by any agency for any period for any purpose except in an employment position authorized by legislative appropriation or by the body authorized by law to escalate budgets and approve employment positions under the guidelines established by the Legislature. Each employment position so authorized shall be classified and assigned a pay range on the basis of actual job content, according to the State Classification Plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 10(1); Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 12; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 173; Laws, 1985, ch. 404, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 25-9-134.
Establishment of program to encourage and recognize excellence in government.

The Legislature finds (a) that effective state and local governmental institutions are essential in the maintenance and development of public administration in an increasingly complex and interdependent society; (b) that since numerous governmental activities administered by district and local governments are related to a statewide purpose and are financed in part by state funds, a state interest exists in a high caliber of public service in state, district and local governments; and (c) that the quality of public service at all levels of government can be improved by the development of innovative systems of public administration.

The State Personnel Board is hereby authorized and directed to establish a program to encourage and recognize excellence, innovation and diversity on the part of state, district and local governmental entities in the design, execution and management of their own administrative procedures. The State Personnel Board shall establish by rule and regulation procedures for evaluating said examples of improvement in public administration, and shall provide for an annual awards program to recognize excellence in government. The board may establish categories of governmental service in order to recognize these achievements.

Nominations for awards under the program of excellence in government prescribed herein shall be made to the State Personnel Director by the governing authority or board of the governmental entity employing the particular individual or group of individuals to be recognized. Such nominations shall be made at such time or times and shall contain such information as the State Personnel Board may prescribe. All nominations shall be submitted by the State Personnel Director to the Governor for review, comments and recommendation at least sixty (60) days prior to final evaluation by the State Personnel Board. An explanation in writing shall be sent to the Governor in the event the State Personnel Board does not concur with recommendations of the Governor in approving or disapproving said nominations.

Nominations for awards under the program of excellence in government shall set forth clear and practicable actions for the improvement of particular aspects of technical or administrative procedure, such as:

Establishment of personnel systems of general or special functional coverage to meet the needs of urban, suburban or rural governmental jurisdictions that may not be able to provide career inducements to well qualified professional, administrative and technical personnel;

Strengthening one or more major areas of public administration, such as personnel recruitment, personnel training, personnel development and payroll administration; or

Increasing intergovernmental cooperation with respect to such matters as personnel interchange, personnel recruiting, manpower utilization and interchange and fringe benefits.

As part of the program of excellence in government, the State Personnel Board shall authorize and establish guidelines for state agencies to accept and present cash awards and bonuses as part of any federally funded employee awards incentive. The guidelines shall authorize state employees to compete for federal incentives and authorize state agencies to accept federal funds earmarked for incentives. All federal awards and bonuses received by state agencies shall not be designated as part of the agency’s yearly budget for the purpose of receiving state appropriations.

The State Personnel Board may evaluate a nominee under the program of excellence in government and recommend a monetary award for those suggestions which improve management of technical or administrative procedures resulting in bona fide cost reduction for the state or local governmental entity. Upon approval of such an award by the board, the State Personnel Board may notify the State Auditor or the local governmental authority, as the case may be, who shall pay the award to the employee upon receipt of the proper requisition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 404, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 389, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 25-9-135.
State personnel director to review payrolls and collect statistical information; retention of payroll warrants for agency violations.

The state personnel director shall review the payroll of each department, agency and institution for conformity with state personnel system rules and regulations and determine whether the payroll conforms to the said rules and regulations and is in compliance with legislatively authorized employment positions. The board shall implement a central personnel record system which shall be used as a basis for payment of salaries of state employees.

In order to furnish the Governor, the State Legislature and the general public with statistical information which can be used in planning departmental programs and budgeting, each department, agency and institution whose employees are in the state and nonstate service shall submit such payroll and other essential personnel and organizational data as may be prescribed and approved by the board to the state personnel director, who shall compile and consolidate reports pertaining to the number of personnel, salaries, length of service, type of work, distribution of employees by departments, agencies and institutions, and other personnel information as may be deemed necessary by the board.

If the personnel director shall determine that any agency as defined by this chapter shall have violated any provision of this chapter, he shall prepare a written report of findings to be certified by the State Personnel Board and furnish the report to the state auditor of public accounts. The state auditor of public accounts shall withhold issuance of any payroll warrant determined in violation of this chapter as certified by the board and shall take such action as required by law to initiate an immediate audit of any agency found in violation for the purpose of civil recovery of funds misspent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 10(2), (3); Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 25-9-137.
Reorganization and consolidation of prior systems.

The Mississippi Classification Commission shall be responsible for a plan to orderly reorganize and consolidate the existing classification commission staff and the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council staff. The reorganization and consolidation plan shall be completed by February 1, 1981. The state capitol commission shall provide such office space as required to accommodate the reorganization and consolidation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved February 8, 1980).

§ 25-9-139.
Status of employees, equipment and supplies of prior systems; transfer of funds appropriated to prior systems.

Employees of the Mississippi Classification Commission and the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council holding positions on February 1, 1981, shall be employees of the State Personnel Board on February 1, 1981; and all offices, equipment, supplies, services, programs and other activities of the Mississippi Classification Commission and the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council are hereby made offices, equipment, supplies, services, programs and other activities of the State Personnel Board.

The State Personnel Board may, with the approval of the commission of budget and accounting require the transfer of funds appropriated for the use of the Mississippi Classification Commission and the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council. Said funds shall be transferred by the state auditor to a separate account in the state treasury. The auditor shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person or officer designated by the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 12, eff from and after February 1, 1981.

§ 25-9-141.
Funding for State Personnel Board; proration of costs; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

The State Personnel Board may, in the discretion of the Legislature, operate from special funds provided from department, agency and institution assessments. If the Legislature adopts the assessment procedure, the cost of those operations shall be prorated among all departments, agencies and institutions, based upon the number of employment positions authorized and/or serviced by the board, and the departments, agencies and institutions shall pay their share of the cost upon receipt of billing from the board. However, for the period beginning July 1, 2010, and ending June 30, 2011, the annual agency assessment authorized in this section shall not be less than One Hundred Twenty Dollars ($120.00) nor more than One Hundred Twenty-seven Dollars ($127.00) per State Personnel Board PIN number.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 13; Laws, 2010, ch. 562, § 11; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-9-143.
Status of employees in merit positions and exempt positions.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, each personnel system officer or employee in a merit position affected by this chapter shall be entitled to all rights which he possessed under the Mississippi Classification Law and under the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council in a merit position before February 1, 1981. All previously exempt employment positions created by separate laws are hereby included in the provisions of this chapter, except as excluded in Section 25-9-107.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 14, eff from and after February 1, 1981.

§ 25-9-145.
Official coercion prohibited; penalties.

No elected state official, elected state district official, appointed state official or member of the judiciary shall use his official authority or influence to coerce, by threat of discharge from employment or otherwise, the political action of a person or body.

Any official who violates this section shall be subject to removal from his position by proceedings initiated in the circuit court by the Office of the Attorney General, on his own motion or on relation of another; and any official so found in violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor in office and imprisoned for a term not less than one (1) year or more than five (5) years or fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both. Funds appropriated for the position from which any official is removed under the provisions of this chapter shall not thereafter be used to pay the salary of such individual.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved February 8, 1980).

§ 25-9-147.
Variable compensation plan; annual review and report; designation of plan as “Colonel Guy Groff State Variable Compensation Plan.”

The State Personnel Board shall review on an annual basis the variable compensation plan adopted by the Legislature at the Regular Session of 1981 and subsequently implemented by the State Personnel Board. Each state department or agency subject to the variable compensation plan shall prepare an annual written report under the direction of the head of that department or agency outlining the impact which the plan has had on that department or agency during the preceding fiscal year. Such department or agency report shall be submitted to the State Personnel Board and shall become a part of the board’s annual review of the variable compensation plan. After conducting its annual review of the plan and studying the report of each department or agency, the State Personnel Board shall prepare a written legislative report, to be submitted to the members of the Mississippi Legislature prior to January 1 of each year. This written report shall accurately reflect the effect of the variable compensation plan on the various departments or agencies subject to the plan. From and after July 1, 1985, the plan shall be named the “Colonel Guy Groff State Variable Compensation Plan”.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 311; Laws, 1985, ch. 362, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 25-9-148.
Annual report regarding increases in compensation, other than salary increases authorized by Legislature.

Before September 1, 1996, and before September 1 of every year thereafter, the State Personnel Board shall prepare a written report to be submitted to the Chairmen of the House of Representatives Appropriations and Fees and Salaries of Public Officers Committees, the Chairmen of the Senate Appropriations and Fees, Salaries and Administration Committees and the Legislative Budget Office specifically describing every increase in compensation, other than salary increases authorized by the Legislature, or additional compensation that was awarded to any state officer, administrator, executive head, employee or employees during the next preceding fiscal year. For each increase or additional compensation awarded, the report shall include no less than the following information: the annual salary of the officer, administrator, executive head or employee before the increase; the total amount of the increase or additional compensation; the justification for the increase or additional compensation; the effective date of the increase or additional compensation; and the source of the additional compensation, including federal or private funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 25-9-149.
Discriminatory practices prohibited.

It is the intent of the Legislature that no person seeking employment in state service, as defined in Section 25-9-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, or employed in state service, as defined in Section 25-9-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age or handicap.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 333, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 25-9-151.
Longevity service award program.

There is hereby established a longevity service award program for full-time employees of the State of Mississippi.

The State Personnel Board shall coordinate the design, purchase, distribution and presentation of service awards based on years of service with the State of Mississippi for full-time employees in all state agencies, boards and commissions.

The longevity service awards shall be made upon attainment of ten (10), twenty (20) and thirty (30) years of full-time service in state government, and shall be the same for all personnel regardless of position or title.

The State Personnel Board shall promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as deemed necessary in carrying out the provisions of this longevity service awards program.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the giving of gifts or monetary bonuses to employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 339, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1990).

§ 25-9-153.
Operator of state-owned vehicle must have valid driver’s license from Mississippi or contiguous state; operator of vehicle owned by state institution of higher learning must have valid driver’s license of appropriate classification from any state; penalty.

Except as provided in paragraph (b), an employee of any state agency, department, board, commission, institution or other instrumentality of the state may not operate a state-owned motor vehicle unless such person has a valid Mississippi driver’s license or a valid driver’s license from a contiguous state.

A person may operate a motor vehicle owned by a state institution of higher learning if they have a valid Mississippi driver’s license of the appropriate classification or a valid driver’s license of the appropriate classification from any state.

A violation of subsection (1) of this section constitutes good cause for dismissal from employment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2015).

§ 25-9-155.
Nonstate service employees to be given preference for state service positions over general public.

The State Personnel Board shall grant part-time employees, as defined in Section 25-9-107(c)(xi), who are fully qualified, and time-limited employees, as defined in Section 25-9-107(c)(xiv), and all other nonstate service employees, who are fully qualified, preference over general public applicants for state service positions in the same manner that preference is given to employees in the state service, as defined in Section 25-9-107(b), for appointment in the state service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 531, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.